North Carolina, session 2025, HB1044.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

CLOSING GAPS IN THE MENTAL HEALTH-JUDICIAL NEXUS
SECTION 1.(a) By no later than January 1, 2027, the Administrative Office of the
Courts (AOC), in coordination with the Department of Health and Human Servives, Division of
Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), shall
develop and disseminate enhanced guidance materials, and develop optional continuing
educational modules, for judges, magistrates, clerks, and other court personnel regarding the
identification of behavioral health risk indicators among court-involved individuals. These
guidance materials shall include all of the following:
*H1044-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Evidence-informed indicators of escalating behavioral health crises.
(2) Risk patterns associated with untreated serious mental illness, substance use
disorders, or co-occurring conditions.
(3) Indicators associated with impaired reality testing, loss of impulse control, or
acute psychiatric decompression.
(4) Appropriate referral pathways for rehabilitative disposition, crisis response,
or involuntary commitment where authorized by law.
(5) Best practices for balancing public safety, civil liberties, and clinical
appropriateness.
SECTION 1.(b) Nothing in subsection (a) of this section shall be construed to alter
the evidentiary standards required for involuntary commitment, detention, or criminal
adjudication.
SECTION 1.(c) By no later than January 1, 2027, the AOC and DMH/DD/SUS shall
jointly develop a statewide framework to strengthen rehabilitative disposition pathways between
district courts, superior courts, and community-based behavioral health providers. The
framework shall include all of the following:
(1) Standardized referral protocols for pretrial rehabilitative disposition into
treatment programs.
(2) Mechanisms for real-time communication between courts and local
management entities/managed care organizations (LME/MCOs).
(3) Expansion of mental health treatment courts where the AOC and
DMH/DD/SUS deem it feasible.
(4) Guidance on coordinating with jail administrators to identify individuals
appropriate for rehabilitative disposition.
(5) Data-sharing agreements consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and
Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA) and State privacy laws.
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 122C-3(11) reads as rewritten:
"(11) Dangerous to self or others.
…
b. Dangerous to others. – Within the relevant past, the individual has
inflicted or attempted to inflict or threatened to inflict serious bodily
harm on another, or has acted in such a way as to create a substantial
risk of serious bodily harm to another, or has engaged in extreme
destruction of property; and that there is a reasonable probability that
this conduct will be repeated. Previous episodes of dangerousness to
others, when applicable, may be considered when determining
reasonable probability of future dangerous conduct. In determining
whether there is a reasonable probability that conduct creating a
substantial risk of serious bodily harm will be repeated, the court may
also consider evidence of a pattern of behavior established by
competent evidence demonstrating recurring loss of volitional control,
including repeated expressions or manifestations that the individual
believes they are not in control of their actions, when such behavior,
viewed in context, reasonably indicates escalating instability that
materially increases the risk of serious bodily harm to another. Clear,
cogent, and convincing evidence that an individual has committed a
homicide in the relevant past is prima facie evidence of dangerousness
to others. Nothing in this sub-subdivision shall be construed to lower
the burden of proof required under this Chapter, to authorize a finding
of dangerousness based solely on verbal statements absent
Page 2 House Bill 1044-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
corroborating evidence, or to diminish any procedural protections
otherwise required by law."
SECTION 1.(e) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the AOC, the sum
of five million dollars ($5,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year.
Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the General Fund to AOC the
sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds. Funds appropriated in this section
shall be used to implement the requirements of this section, including any of the following:
(1) Development and dissemination of guidance and training materials under
subsection (a) of this section.
(2) Information technology upgrades and secure data-sharing infrastructure
necessary to facilitate coordination between courts and behavioral health
systems under subsection (c) of this section.
(3) Establishment or expansion of regional coordination between courts and
behavioral health providers under subsection (c) of this section.
(4) Administrative costs associated with rehabilitative disposition framework
implementation under subsection (c) of this section.
SECTION 1.(f) No later than December 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, the AOC,
in cooperation with DMH/DD/SUS, shall provide a report to the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Health
and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the status of appropriations contained
in this section, including (i) expenditures made pursuant to this section, (ii) progress toward
implementation of this section, and (iii) measurable outcomes related to rehabilitative
disposition, detention reduction, and recidivism. Additionally, no later than December 1, 2027,
the AOC, in cooperation with DMH/DD/SUS, shall provide a report to the Joint Legislative
Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety and the Joint Legislative Oversight Committee
on Health and Human Services on the status of the framework developed under subsection (c) of
this section, including all of the following:
(1) The number of court-involved individuals diverted to treatment.
(2) Changes in pretrial detention rates for individuals with serious mental illness.
(3) Impacts on recidivism.
(4) Identified statutory or operational barriers requiring further legislative action.
SECTION 1.(g) Subsection (d) of this section becomes effective December 1, 2026,
and applies to determinations of dangerousness made on or after that date. The remainder of this
section becomes effective July 1, 2026.

REHABILITATIVE DISPOSITION AND COMMUNITY SAFETY PROGRAMS
SECTION 2. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is appropriated from the
General Fund to DMH/DD/SUS, the sum of two hundred twenty-four million dollars
($224,000,000) in recurring funds. These funds shall be used to create, expand, or otherwise
support, in coordination with AOC, behavioral health treatment capacity and related
court-support initiatives intended to (i) increase timely access to appropriate behavioral health
evaluation, stabilization, and treatment services, (ii) reduce delays in case processing associated
with unmet behavioral health needs, and (iii) improve public safety outcomes, including all of
the following:
(1) Crisis response and clinical stabilization capacity, including mobile crisis
services, crisis receiving and observation services, and short-term stabilization
services.
(2) Community-based assessment, treatment, and recovery services, including
outpatient services, intensive outpatient services, medication management,
peer support, care coordination, and continuity-of-care services.
House Bill 1044-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Judicially Managed Accountable Recovery Courts (JMARCs) and other
court-associated clinical services and continuity supports that facilitate timely
evaluation and appropriate treatment engagement, including clinical
evaluation capacity, referral coordination, case management supports, and
service navigation supports implemented in collaboration with the courts.
(4) Other evidence-based behavioral health initiatives that reduce court delays
associated with unmet behavioral health needs and improve public safety
outcomes.

STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITAL BEDS AND STAFFING
SECTION 3.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and
Substance Use Services (DMH/DD/SUS), the sum of three hundred twenty million four hundred
thousand dollars ($320,400,000) in recurring funds beginning with the 2026-2027 fiscal year to
be used for hiring or contracting staff to facilitate the operation of State psychiatric hospitals.
SECTION 3.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management (OSBM) the sum of one hundred eighteen million dollars
($118,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be allocated and used as
provided in this subsection. OSBM shall allocate these funds to DMH/DD/SUS to be used to
build increased capacity in the State psychiatric hospitals, provided that OSBM shall not transfer
these allocated funds to DMH/DD/SUS until DMH/DD/SUS has certified that bed capacity in
the State psychiatric hospitals has been filled or is expected to be filled within 90 days. The funds
appropriated in this subsection shall not revert but shall remain available until expended.
SECTION 3.(c) There is appropriated from the General Fund to DMH/DD/SUS the
sum of thirty-five million six hundred thousand dollars ($35,600,000) in recurring funds
beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for hiring or contracting staff to facilitate the
operation of increased capacity of State psychiatric hospitals built as a result of the funds
provided in subsection (b) of this section. If, at the end of each fiscal year, OSBM has not
transferred funds under subsection (b) of this section, these funds shall revert.
SECTION 3.(d) Funds appropriated in subsections (a) and (c) of this section may be
used for initiatives that improve workforce stability and retention, including preceptor programs,
structured onboarding, staff training, supervisory development, employee assistance supports,
and workplace safety improvements, provided that funds shall not be used for bonuses except as
part of a retention plan approved by the Department of Health and Human Services.

INCREASE LIMIT ON SAFEKEEPER BEDS AND PROVIDE ADDITIONAL
FUNDING
SECTION 4.(a) G.S. 162-39(e) reads as rewritten:
"(e) The number of county prisoners incarcerated in the State prison system pursuant to
safekeeping orders from the various counties pursuant to subsection (b) of this section or for
medical or mental health treatment pursuant to subsection (d) of this section may not exceed 200
500 at any given time unless authorized by the Secretary of Adult Correction. The Secretary may
refuse to accept any safekeeper and may return any safekeeper transferred under a safekeeping
order when this capacity limit is reached. The Secretary shall not refuse to accept a safekeeper
because a county has failed to pay the Department of Adult Correction for services rendered
pursuant to this section."
SECTION 4.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Adult Correction (DAC) the sum of ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used for any nonrecurring costs incurred from implementing
the increase of county prisoners incarcerated in the State prison authorized under G.S. 162-39(e),
as amended by subsection (a) of this section. Beginning in the 2026-2027 fiscal year, there is
Page 4 House Bill 1044-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
appropriated from the General Fund to the DAC the sum of sixteen million dollars ($16,000,000)
in recurring funds to be used for any operational costs or other recurring costs incurred from
implementing the increase of county prisoners incarcerated in the State prison authorized under
G.S. 162-39(e), as amended by subsection (a) of this section.

REPORTS
SECTION 5. No later than July 1, 2027, the Department of Health and Human
Services, Division of Mental Health, Developmental Disabilities, and Substance Use Services,
in coordination with the Administrative Office of the Courts, shall provide a report to the Joint
Legislative Oversight Committee on Justice and Public Safety, the Joint Legislative Oversight
Committee on Health and Human Services, and the Fiscal Research Division on the status of the
appropriations contained in Sections 2 and 3 of this act, including (i) cost-savings to the court
system, (ii) reductions in case loads, (iii) reductions in the State's incarcerated population, and
(iv) any impacts on recidivism. An updated report shall be provided no later than December 1,
2027, and annually thereafter.

EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
House Bill 1044-First Edition Page 5